Hawaii statutes.
[§448B-6] Licensure by endorsement.
The director shall grant, upon application and payment of proper fees,
licensure to a person who, at the time of application, holds a valid
certification or license as a dietitian issued by another state, territory, or
jurisdiction if the requirements for that certification or license are equal
to, or greater than, the requirements of this chapter. [L 2000, c 280, pt of
§2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next